Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.031

License required.

No person may practice or represent himself or herself as an osteopathic physician and surgeon without first having a valid license to do so.

[ 1987 c 150 s 42.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.